Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,161
Sections; how construed.

Sections 81-5,158 to 81-5,164 shall not be construed to:

(1) Relieve any person from payment of local license or permit fees;

(2) Limit the power of the state or political subdivisions to regulate the quality and character of work performed by water-based fire protection system contractors through a system of permits, fees, and inspections which are designed to assure compliance with, and aid in the implementation of, state and local building laws or to enforce other local laws for the protection of the public health and safety; or

(3) Limit the power of the state or political subdivisions to adopt any system of permits requiring submission to and approval by the state or political subdivision of plans and specifications for work to be performed by water-based fire protection system contractors before commencement of the work.

Laws 1997, LB 636, § 4.